District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-310.01c

Determination of entities with business interests in Republic of South Africa.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1003a
as added May 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-116, § 2, 33 DCR 2432
July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-127, § 6(c), 39 DCR 3828
June 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-134, § 6(b), 41 DCR 2597

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1192.3.